Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1315
Auditor of Public Accounts; annual audit of retirement system; annual report to Clerk of the Legislature.

It shall be the duty of the Auditor of Public Accounts to make an annual audit of the retirement system and an annual report to the retirement board and to the Clerk of the Legislature of the condition of the retirement system. Each member of the Legislature shall receive a copy of the report required by this section by making a request for such report to either the Auditor of Public Accounts or the retirement board.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 15, p. 1673;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 37;

Laws 1972, LB 1072, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 75;

Laws 1988, LB 1169, § 2.